Hawaii, session 2025, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, in Hawaii, there are gaps in specialty care, especially in endocrinology, rheumatology, gastroenterology, and behavioral health.  Specialists and patients utilize costly travel to and from the Honolulu urban hub to provide and receive specialty care. The legislature further finds that there are programs that provide medical education and help to improve healthcare delivery to underserved and remote areas.  One such program is Project Extension for Community Healthcare Outcomes (ECHO).  Project ECHO is a hub and spoke model that been able to achieve outcomes at primary care sites equal to those at academic medical centers for complex conditions such as hepatitis and diabetes.  Utilizing ongoing telemonitoring, primary care clinicians who participate through Project ECHO develop expertise in complex disease management and become recognized within their communities as local resources for patients requiring specialized care.  Supporting programs like Project ECHO will bolster the knowledge and use of specialty care by health providers in Hawaii, especially in rural and remote areas of the State. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish and fund a medical education liaison position; and (2)  Appropriate funds to support programs that utilize a team of medical specialists to support primary care providers and other health care professionals through mentorship and guidance. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     Medical education; liaison.  (a)  There is established within the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine a full-time medical education liaison position. (b) The medical education liaison shall be responsible for supporting participating programs that utilize a team of medical specialists to support primary care providers and other health care professionals through mentorship and guidance.  The liaison's responsibilities shall include: (1)  Organizing sessions statewide for participating programs; (2)  Coordinating communications between healthcare providers and specialists; (3)  Developing and implementing strategies to expand the reach of participating programs; (4)  Assisting in the collection and analysis of data to evaluate any participating program's outcomes; and (5)  Performing any other duties as necessary to support the effective operation of participating programs." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) medical education liaison position established pursuant to section 304A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support programs that utilize a team of medical specialists to support primary care providers and other health care professionals through mentorship and guidance. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________